Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-105
Violations; penalties.

Any officer or person who may be in charge of any such bids prior to the time fixed for the simultaneous opening, who shall open prior to such time, or otherwise disclose to any bidder the contents, amount or other details of any rival bid, shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 73-101 to 73-104 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1923, c. 131, § 1, p. 324;

C.S.1929, § 73-101;

Laws 1935, c. 145, § 1, p. 539;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 73-101;

R.S.1943, § 73-105;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 181.

Effect of penalty raised but not decided. Niklaus v. Miller, 159 Neb. 301, 66 N.W.2d 824 (1954).